Missouri, session 2026, HB2842.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.652, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 67.652, to read as follows:
67.652. 1. The authority shall consist of up to eleven commissioners who shall be
qualified voters of the state of Missouri and residents of either the city or the county. The
commissioners first appointed shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Up to [three] two commissioners who shall be residents of the city may be
appointed by the chief executive of the city with the advice and consent of the [board of
aldermen] governor;
(2) Up to [three] five commissioners who shall be residents of the county may be
appointed by the chief executive of the county with the advice and consent of the [county
council] governor; and
(3) Up to five commissioners one of whom shall be the chairman, two of whom shall
be a resident of the city, two of whom shall be a resident of the county and one of whom shall
be a resident of the city, the county or a county contiguous to the county, [may] shall be
appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor shall
appoint one of the commissioners to be the chairman of the authority. Of the commissioners
appointed by the chief executive of the city, no more than two shall be of the same political
party, of the commissioners appointed by the chief executive of the county, no more than two
shall be of the same political party and of the commissioners appointed by the governor, no
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2842 2
more than three shall be of the same political party. In addition, no elective or appointed
official of the state of Missouri or of any political subdivision thereof shall be a commissioner
of the authority. Upon the appointment of eight commissioners as above provided, the
authority shall be deemed to be duly constituted and shall be authorized to commence
operations as provided in sections 67.650 to 67.658; but, after the authority is duly constituted
nothing herein shall prohibit the appointment of additional commissioners up to the limits and
in the manner provided in this section.
2. The commissioners shall serve for terms of six years, except that of the first such
commissioners appointed, the first person, if any, appointed by the governor, the chief
executive of the city and the chief executive of the county, respectively, shall serve for terms
of two years, the next two persons, if any, appointed by the governor, and the next person, if
any, appointed by the chief executive of the city and the chief executive of the county,
respectively, shall serve for terms of four years, and the final persons, if any, appointed by the
governor, the chief executive of the city and the chief executive of the county, respectively,
shall serve for terms of six years. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has
been appointed and qualified. No more than six commissioners of the authority shall be of
the same political party.
3. In the event a vacancy exists or in the event a commissioner's term expires, a
successor commissioner shall be appointed by whomever appointed the commissioner who
initially held the vacant position and if no person is so selected within sixty days of the
creation of the vacancy, the unexpired term of such commissioner may be filled by a majority
vote of the remainder of the commissioners, provided that such successor commissioner shall
meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 above. Commissioners
appointed to fill unexpired terms shall only serve until such unexpired term expires. Pending
any such appointment to fill any vacancy, the remaining commissioners may conduct
authority business.
4. The authority shall elect from its number a chairman and may appoint such officers
and employ such employees as it may require for the performance of its duties, and may fix
and determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. No action of the authority shall
be binding unless taken at a meeting at which at least a majority of the commissioners then
appointed vote in favor of such action. The commissioners shall be reimbursed by the
authority for the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
5. In the event any of the state of Missouri, the city or the county fails to make any
appropriation or to pay any rents, fees or charges provided in any contract, agreement lease or
sublease between the authority and one or more of the state of Missouri, the city and the
county, the commissioners, if any, appointed by the governor, if the state of Missouri has
failed to make such appropriation or to pay such rents, fees or charges, and the

HB 2842 3
commissioners, if any, appointed by the chief executive of the city or county, if the city or
county, as applicable, has failed to make such appropriation or to pay such rents, fees or
charges, shall be disqualified from voting on any matter, action or resolution to come before
the authority, and from participating in any of the business of the authority, so long as any
such failure continues. If less than a majority of the commissioners then appointed are
thereby qualified to vote, the commissioners that remain qualified to vote shall constitute a
quorum and any action of the authority which is approved by a majority of such qualified
commissioners, shall be binding upon the authority.
✔